Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3702
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Brain Injury Assistance Act:

(1) Brain injury has the definition found in section 81-654; and

(2) Committee means the Brain Injury Oversight Committee created in section 71-3703.

Laws 2019, LB481, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB971, § 2.